District of Columbia statutes.
15-902

Variation by agreement.

(a)

The effect of this chapter may be varied by agreement of the parties made before or after commencement of an action or distribution proceeding or the entry of judgment.

(b)

Parties to a transaction may agree upon the money to be used in a transaction giving rise to a foreign-money claim and may agree to use different moneys for different aspects of the transaction. Stating the price in a foreign money for one aspect of a transaction does not alone require the use of that money for other aspects of the transaction.

Feb. 10, 1996, D.C. Law 11-85, § 2, 42 DCR 6791
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 101, 51 DCR 881
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 85(e), 52 DCR 2638
1981 Ed., § 15-902.
D.C. Law 15-105, in subsec. (a), substituted “this chapter” for “this act”.
D.C. Law 15-354, in subsec. (a), substituted “this chapter” for “this subchapter”.
D.C. Law 15-354 validated a previously made technical correction.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 3 of the Uniform Foreign-Money Claims Act.